Massachusetts, session 194th, S456.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The second paragraph of section 1L of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in
the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, in line 30, after the word
“resuscitation” the following:−
and the use of automatic external defibrillators. Instruction in cardiopulmonary
resuscitation and the use of automatic external defibrillators must be the most current national
evidence−based Emergency Cardiovascular Care guidelines and incorporate psychomotor skills
development into the instruction. “Psychomotor skills” is defined as the use of hands-on
practicing and skills testing to support cognitive learning. A licensed teacher shall not be
required to be a certified trainer of cardiopulmonary resuscitation, to facilitate, provide or
of 2

oversee such instruction for non-certification. Courses which result in a certification being
earned are required to be taught by an authorized CPR/AED instructor.
of 2